District of Columbia statutes.
16-3107

Enforcement of judgments, orders and decrees; application of property sequestrated.

The Probate Court may enforce its judgments, orders, decrees, and decisions in the manner provided by sections 16-3103 and 16-3104 . When a judgment, order, decree, or decision is for the payment of money, the court may apply the property sequestrated to the purpose for which the judgment, order, decree, or decision is given.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 600, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-3107.
1973 Ed., § 16-3107.